District of Columbia statutes.
36-102

Unauthorized use or sale of registered bottles.

It shall be unlawful for any person, without the permission of the owner thereof, to fill with mineral waters or other beverages any such bottles so marked, for sale, or to traffic in any such bottles so marked and not bought by him of such owner; and every person so offending shall be liable to a penalty of $.50 for every bottle so filled, or sold, or used, or disposed of, or bought, or trafficked in, for the 1st offense, and of $5 for every subsequent offense, to be recovered as other fines are recovered in the District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1333, ch. 854, § 878
1973 Ed., § 48-102.
1981 Ed., § 48-102.
Deceptive imitation of goods, criminal penalty, see § 22-1502.